Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-351.01
Sport utility vehicle, defined.

Sport utility vehicle means a high-performance motor vehicle weighing six thousand pounds or less designed to carry ten passengers or less or designated as a sport utility vehicle by the manufacturer.

Laws 2007, LB286, § 29.